Hawaii statutes.
§421I-13 Service of process. The board
of directors of the corporation shall establish a policy to provide reasonable
access to persons authorized to serve civil process in compliance with section
634-21.5. [L 2009, c 158, §§1, 8; am L 2011, c 65, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next